Hawaii statutes.
§501-167 New certificate upon reverter of
land. When for any reason, by operation of law, land which was taken for a
public use reverts to the owner from whom it was taken or to the owner's heirs
or assigns, the court, upon the petition of the person entitled to the benefit
of reversion, after notice and hearing, may order the entry of a new
certificate of title to the person. [L 1903, c 56, §91; RL 1925, §3280; RL
1935, §5088; RL 1945, §12688; RL 1955, §342-88; HRS §501-167; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

New certificate of title, see RLC rule 59(m).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next